Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 11

Tennessee Minority-Owned, Woman-Owned, Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned, Business Owned by Persons with Disabilities, and Small Business Procurement and Contracting Act

12-3-1101. Short title.

Sections 12-3-1101 — 12-3-1108 shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Minority-Owned, Woman-Owned, Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned, Business Owned by Persons with Disabilities, and Small Business Procurement and Contracting Act.”

Acts 1980, ch. 888, § 2; T.C.A., §12-3-601; Acts 1988, ch. 818, § 1; 2004, ch. 569, § 1; T.C.A.§12-3-801; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 64; 2017, ch. 485, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former title 12, ch. 3, part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Attorney General Opinions. Any racial classification used in awarding public contracts is subject to strict scrutiny and will only be upheld if the state or local government can establish that it is narrowly tailored to promote a compelling governmental interest. Courts have found that remedying the effects of past intentional discrimination is a compelling governmental interest. OAG 12-92, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 90 (10/3/12).

12-3-1102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Business owned by persons with disabilities” means a business owned by a person with a disability that is a continuing, independent, for-profit business that performs a commercially useful function, and is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned and controlled by one (1) or more persons with a disability; or, in the case of any publicly owned business, at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the stock of which is owned and controlled by one (1) or more persons with a disability and whose management and daily business operations are under the control of one (1) or more persons with a disability;

“Department” means the department of general services;

“Minority” means a person who is a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States and who is:

African American, a person having origins in any of the black racial groups of Africa;

Hispanic, a person of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, Central or South American, or other Spanish culture or origin, regardless of race;

Asian American, a person having origins in any of the original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands; or

Native American, a person having origins in any of the original peoples of North America;

“Minority-owned business” means a minority-owned business that is a continuing, independent, for profit business that performs a commercially useful function, and is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned and controlled by one (1) or more minority individuals who are impeded from normal entry into the economic mainstream because of past practices of discrimination based on race or ethnic background;

“Person with a disability” means an individual who meets at least one (1) of the following:

Has been diagnosed as having a physical or mental disability resulting in marked and severe functional limitations that is expected to last no less than twelve (12) months;

Is eligible to receive social security disability insurance (SSDI); or

Is eligible to receive supplemental security income (SSI) and has a disability as defined in subdivision (5)(A);

“Procurement and contracting” means the procurement of equipment, supplies, personal services, professional services, consulting services, construction contracts, and architectural and engineering services;

“Service-disabled veteran” means any person who served honorably on active duty in the armed forces of the United States with at least a twenty percent (20%) disability that is service-connected, meaning that such disability was incurred or aggravated in the line of duty in the active military, naval or air service;

“Service-disabled veteran-owned business” means a service-disabled veteran-owned business that is a continuing, independent, for profit business located in this state that performs a commercially useful function, and:

Is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned and controlled by one (1) or more service-disabled veterans;

In the case of a business solely owned by one (1) service-disabled veteran and such person's spouse, is at least fifty percent (50%) owned and controlled by the service-disabled veteran; or

In the case of any publicly owned business, at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the stock of which is owned and controlled by one (1) or more service-disabled veterans and whose management and daily business operations are under the control of one (1) or more service-disabled veterans;

“Small business” means a business that is a continuing, independent, for profit business which performs a commercially useful function with residence in this state and has total gross receipts of not more than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) averaged over a three-year period or employs no more than ninety-nine (99) persons on a full-time basis;

“State agency” means any department, office, institution of higher education, board, commission, or any other state agency that receives state funds; and

“Woman-owned business” means a woman-owned business that is a continuing, independent, for profit business that performs a commercially useful function, and is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned and controlled by one or more women; or, in the case of any publicly owned business, at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the stock of which is owned and controlled by one (1) or more women and whose management and daily business operations are under the control of one (1) or more women.

Acts 1980, ch. 888, § 4; T.C.A., §12-3-602; Acts 1988, ch. 818, § 2; 1993, ch. 488, § 2; 1994, ch. 767, § 3; 1994, ch. 981, § 1; 2004, ch. 569, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2010, ch. 1135, §§ 8, 9; 2010, ch. 1140, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, § 5; T.C.A. §12-3-802; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 65; 2017, ch. 485, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-1103. Criteria and standards for eligibility.

The procurement commission is authorized to adopt rules and regulations establishing criteria and standards for minority-owned businesses, woman-owned businesses, service-disabled veteran-owned businesses, businesses owned by persons with disabilities, and small businesses that are eligible to be included under this part. The rules and regulations must include methods by which eligibility can be verified and the business deemed certified.

Such criteria and standards for eligibility shall include, but not be limited to, the number of employees, the total gross receipts or annual sales volume, including ownership and control.

The maximum number of employees and the maximum dollar value of a small business under such rules and regulations may vary from industry to industry to the extent necessary to reflect the differing characteristics of any relevant factors of each particular industry.

The governor's office of diversity business enterprises shall implement and administer a certification program and publish a directory of businesses certified as small businesses and diversity business enterprises.

Any business desiring to be certified as a small business or diversity business enterprise shall make application to the governor's office of diversity business enterprises on an application as prescribed by such office.

Acts 1980, ch. 888, § 5; T.C.A., §12-3-603; Acts 1988, ch. 818, § 3; 2004, ch. 569, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2010, ch. 1135, § 10; 2010, ch. 1140, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19; T.C.A. §12-3-803; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 66; 2017, ch. 485, §§ 6, 7.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-1104. Active solicitation of bids and proposals required.

All state agencies are required to actively solicit bids and proposals for equipment, supplies, personal services, professional services, consulting services, construction contracts, and architectural and engineering services from a minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business in order to strive to obtain a fair proportion of procurements from any minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business.

The amount of fair proportion shall be recommended annually by the governor's office of diversity business enterprises to the procurement commission for its review and approval. In annually determining the amount of fair proportion, the procurement commission shall establish, based on the recommendation of the governor's office of diversity business enterprises, a separate amount of fair proportion for each of the five (5) subcategories of businesses identified in § 12-3-1102: minority-owned businesses, woman-owned businesses, service-disabled veteran-owned businesses, businesses owned by persons with disabilities, and small businesses. Nothing in this part establishes any mandatory goal or quota with respect to minority-owned businesses, woman-owned businesses, service-disabled veteran-owned businesses, businesses owned by persons with disabilities, or small businesses.

Procurements shall not be deemed to be from either minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business if the business with which such contracting is done is owned by or is under the controlling interest of another business which exceeds the limitations of § 12-3-1103. No minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business to which a contract has been awarded shall subcontract any portion of such contract with any business which exceeds the limitations of § 12-3-1103 and continue to maintain eligibility under this part without express approval of the chief procurement officer.

As used in subsection (a), “actively solicit bids and proposals” may include contacting the governor's office of diversity business enterprises; reviewing compiled directories of a minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business; purchasing publication of notices within newspapers of general circulation or through electronic media; and inviting any minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business to submit bids or to obtain information pertaining to the submission of bids.

Acts 1980, ch. 888, § 6; T.C.A., §12-3-604; Acts 1988, ch. 818, § 4; 1993, ch. 521, § 2; 1994, ch. 981, § 4; 2004, ch. 569, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2010, ch. 1140, §§ 3, 4; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19; T.C.A. §12-3-804; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 67; 2017, ch. 485, §§ 8, 9.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-1105. Design and implementation of procedures.

The departments of general services, finance and administration, transportation and economic and community development, and the state building commission shall cooperate with the governor's office of diversity business enterprises in the design and implementation of procedures for the identification of any minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business, the selection for bid and proposal lists and the monitoring of procurements from minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business.

Acts 1980, ch. 888, § 7; T.C.A., §12-3-605; Acts 1988, ch. 818, § 5; 2004, ch. 569, § 1; 2010, ch. 1140, § 5; T.C.A. §12-3-805; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 67; 2017, ch. 485, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-1106. Diversity business program director — Annual goals for contracting with businesses.

The chief procurement officer, as director of the governor's office of diversity business enterprises, shall appoint a diversity business program director to work in conjunction with the departments of general services, finance and administration, transportation, economic and community development and the state building commission to:

Compile and maintain a comprehensive list of any minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business by cooperating with both governmental and private sector entities in locating potential sources for various products and services;

Assist any minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business in complying with state procurement and contracting procedures and requirements;

Examine requests from state agencies for the purchase of goods or services to help determine which solicitations may offer increased opportunities for any minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business; and

Make recommendations to appropriate state agencies for the simplification of procurement and contract specifications and terms in order to increase the opportunities of participation by any minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business.

All state agencies shall fully cooperate with the governor's office of diversity business enterprises and shall provide staff support and any other assistance upon request of the chief procurement officer. This cooperation specifically includes, but is not limited to, establishing and striving to achieve annual state agency level internal goals for minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business contracting. In establishing and striving to achieve these annual goals, each agency shall work closely with the governor's office of diversity business enterprises. Each agency shall provide as requested to the governor's office of diversity business enterprises periodic reports on upcoming procurement and contract opportunities and on the level of participation by minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business in that agency's procurements and contracts.

Acts 1980, ch. 888, § 9; T.C.A., §12-3-607; Acts 1988, ch. 818, § 7; 2004, ch. 569, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2010, ch. 1140, § 7; 2011, ch. 295, § 5; T.C.A. §12-3-807; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 67; 2017, ch. 485, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-1107. Annual report.

The chief procurement officer shall annually report, on or before each December 31, to the governor and to each member of the general assembly concerning the awarding of purchases to minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business and the total value of awards made during the preceding fiscal year under this part. The chief procurement officer shall also include in such annual report:

The number of solicitations of minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business by category;

The number of responses received from minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business by category;

The dollar amount of purchases awarded to such businesses by category; and

The total dollar amount of purchases awarded to all businesses in the state.

In annually reporting the information on any minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business, based upon information provided by vendors, the chief procurement officer shall, in a separate section of the report, indicate the number of businesses solicited within each of the five (5) subcategories enumerated within § 12-3-1102, the number of responses received from each of the five (5) subcategories enumerated within § 12-3-1102, and the total number and dollar amount of all purchases awarded within each of the five (5) subcategories enumerated within § 12-3-1102. For purposes of evaluation, the report shall also indicate the total number and dollar amount of all purchases by all state agencies during the reporting period.

Acts 1980, ch. 888, § 10; T.C.A., §12-3-608; Acts 1988, ch. 818, § 8; 1994, ch. 981, § 5; 2004, ch. 569, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2010, ch. 1140, § 8; 2011, ch. 295, § 5; T.C.A. §12-3-808; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 67; 2017, ch. 485, §§ 12, 13, 17.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

12-3-1108. Preference to in-state meat producers by departments and agencies.

All departments, agencies and institutions of state government that purchase meat, meat food products or meat by-products, as defined in §53-7-202, with state funds shall give preference to producers located within the boundaries of this state when awarding contracts or agreements for the purchase of such meat or meat products, so long as the terms, conditions and quality associated with the in-state producers' proposals are equal to those obtainable from producers located elsewhere.

Acts 1975, ch. 20, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 12-348,12-3-121; T.C.A. §12-3-809; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 67.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-1109. Preference to in-state meat producers by schools.

All public education institutions using state funds to purchase meat, meat food products, or meat by-products, as defined in §53-7-202, shall give preference in awarding contracts or agreements for the purchase of such meat or meat products to producers located within the boundaries of this state so long as the terms, conditions and quality associated with the in-state producers' proposals are equal to those obtainable from producers located elsewhere.

Acts 1975, ch. 20, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 12-349,12-3-122; T.C.A. §12-3-810; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 67.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-1110. Preference to in-state coal mining companies.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all state agencies, departments, boards, commissions, institutions, institutions of higher education, schools and all other state entities shall purchase coal mined in this state if such coal is available at a delivered price that is equal to or less than coal mined outside the state.

Acts 1983, ch. 225, § 1; T.C.A. §12-3-811; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 67.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-1111. Preference to in-state natural gas producers.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all state agencies, departments, boards, commissions, institutions, institutions of higher education, schools and all other state entities shall purchase natural gas produced from wells located in the state if such gas is available at a price which is equal to or less than natural gas produced from wells located outside the state, transportation costs taken into account.

Acts 1983, ch. 247, § 1; T.C.A. §12-3-812; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 67.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-1112. Governor's office of diversity business enterprises — Purpose — Small business liaison representative — Study of opportunities.

There is created the governor's office of diversity business enterprises to administer this part. All positions, resources and functions of the governor's office of diversity business enterprises existing within the department of general services shall be transferred to the procurement office on October 1, 2011.

The office of diversity business enterprises shall assist small businesses and businesses owned by minorities, women, service-disabled veterans, and persons with disabilities to develop into viable, successful businesses. This work shall include assisting these businesses to compete successfully for the state's expenditures for goods and services.

Each state agency shall designate a staff person as a small business liaison representative to the governor's office of diversity business enterprises to coordinate the agency's efforts to utilize small businesses and diversity business enterprises in their procurement and contracting opportunities.

After appointment of the chief procurement officer, such officer, in consultation with the department of general services and the department of economic and community development, shall study opportunities available to small businesses and diversity business enterprises in state contracting and the potential effect of enhancing such opportunities through utilization of monetary allowances. It is the legislative intent that such study shall, insofar as possible, assess the impact on small businesses and diversity business enterprises that would have occurred if monetary allowances of varying amounts had been available. Further, it is the legislative intent that such study shall estimate the costs to the state that would have resulted from such monetary allowances.

The small business advocate within the office of the comptroller of the treasury shall be qualified by training or relevant and recent experience in administering programs to encourage and enhance economic opportunities for minority-owned businesses, woman-owned businesses, service-disabled veteran-owned businesses, businesses owned by persons with disabilities, and small businesses. At least annually, the advocate shall attend training or other specialized instruction to enhance understanding of the particular obstacles impeding minority-owned businesses, woman-owned businesses, service-disabled veteran-owned businesses, businesses owned by persons with disabilities, and small businesses from normal entry into the economic mainstream. The training shall be provided by the governor's office of diversity business enterprises in the normal course of business as part of the regular training program for state agencies. When the advocate position is filled by reassigning a current employee, such employee shall receive the requisite training prior to assuming advocate duties.

Acts 2010, ch. 1135, §§ 7, 11, 13; T.C.A. §12-3-813; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 67; 2017, ch. 485, §§ 14-16.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-1113. Preference to
goods produced or grown in this state, including agricultural products.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all departments and agencies making purchases of goods, including agricultural products, shall give preference to those produced or grown in this state or offered by Tennessee respondents as follows:

Goods produced in this state or offered by Tennessee respondents shall be given equal preference if the cost to the state and quality are equal; and

Agricultural products grown in this state shall be given first preference and agricultural products offered by Tennessee respondents shall be given second preference, if the cost to the state and quality are equal.

If goods, including agricultural products, produced or grown in this state or offered by Tennessee respondents are not equal in cost and quality to other products, then goods, including agricultural products, produced or grown in other states of the United States shall be given preference over foreign products if the cost to the state and quality are equal.

As used in this section:

“Agricultural products” includes textiles and other similar products; and

“Tennessee respondents” means a business:

Incorporated in this state;

That has its principal place of business in this state; or

That has an established physical presence in this state.

The commission and all state agencies making purchases of vegetation for landscaping purposes, including plants, shall give preference to Tennessee vegetation native to the region if the cost to the state is not greater and the quality is not inferior.

All departments and agencies procuring services shall give preference to services offered by a Tennessee respondent if:

The services meet state requirements regarding the service to be performed and expected quality; and

The cost of the service does not exceed the cost of other similar services of similar expected quality that are not offered by a Tennessee respondent.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 67.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 11, §§12-3-1101 —12-3-1103 (Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 5; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the advisory committee for the use of the internet, was repealed by Act 2013, ch. 272, § 1, effective April 25, 2013; and former part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-121 were transferred to this section.